Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 4
ORDINANCE CODES ADOPTED BY REFERENCE

30-35-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adopting county" means any home rule county adopting an ordinance pursuant to the provisions of this part 4.

"Code" means any published compilation of statutes, ordinances, rules, regulations, or standards adopted by the federal government or the state of Colorado, or by an agency of either of them, or by any municipality or county within the state of Colorado. It includes any codification or compilation of existing ordinances of the adopting county. The operation of this article as to published compilations of any organization or institution shall be limited to building codes, which may embrace any of the following subjects: The construction, alteration, repair, removal, demolition, equipment, use and occupancy, location, and maintenance of buildings or other structures, whether erected before, on, or after June 8, 1981.

"County clerk" means the county clerk and recorder or equivalent officer.

"Governing body" means the governing body of a home rule county.

"Primary code" means any code which is directly adopted by reference in whole or in part by any ordinance passed pursuant to this part 4.

"Published" means issued in printed, lithographed, multigraphed, mimeographed, or similar form.

"Secondary code" means any code which is incorporated by reference, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, in any primary code or in any secondary code.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1473, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-402. Adoption by reference - title.

If all the procedures and requirements of this part 4 are complied with, any home rule county is authorized to enact any ordinance which adopts any code by reference, in whole or in part; and such primary code, thus adopted, may in turn adopt by reference, in whole or in part, any secondary codes duly described therein. However, every primary code and every secondary code which is incorporated in any such adopting ordinance shall be specified in the title of the ordinance.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1474, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-403. Notice - hearing.

After the first reading of the adopting ordinance and of the code to be adopted thereby, and of any secondary codes therein adopted by reference, the governing body shall schedule a public hearing thereon. Notice of the hearing shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the adopting county, once at least fifteen days preceding the hearing and once at least eight days preceding it. If there is no such newspaper, the notice shall be posted in the same manner as provided for the posting of a proposed ordinance. The notice shall state the time and place of the hearing. It shall also state that copies of the primary code and also copies of the secondary codes, if any, being considered for adoption are on file with the county clerk and recorder and are open to public inspection. The notice shall also contain a description which the governing body deems sufficient to give notice to interested persons of the purpose of the code and of any secondary code incorporated therein by reference, the subject matter of each such code, the name and address of the agency by which each has been promulgated, or, if a municipality or county, the corporate name of such municipality or county which has enacted such code, and the date of publication of such code or codes, and in the case of a code of any municipality or county the notice shall contain specific reference to code or codes of a given municipality or county as they existed and were effective at a given date.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1474, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-404. Adopting ordinance - adoption of penalty clauses by reference prohibited.

After the hearing, the governing body may amend, adopt, or reject the adopting ordinance in the same manner in which it is empowered to act in the case of other ordinances; but nothing in this article shall be deemed to permit the adoption by reference of any penalty clauses which may appear in any code which is adopted by reference. Any such penalty clauses may be enacted only if set forth in full in the adopting ordinance. All changes or additions to any code made by the governing body shall be published in the manner which is required for ordinances.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1474, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-405. Publication of ordinance.

Nothing contained in this part 4 shall be deemed to relieve any home rule county from the requirement of publishing in full the ordinance which adopts any such code, and all provisions applicable to such publication shall be fully carried out. The adopting ordinance shall contain the same description of the primary adopted code and of each secondary code incorporated therein by reference, as required in the notice of hearing in section 30-35-403.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1474, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-406. Filing of public record - sale of copies.

Not less than three copies of each primary code adopted by reference, and of each secondary code pertaining thereto, all certified to be true copies by the county executive officer and the county clerk, shall be filed in the office of the county clerk at least fifteen days preceding the hearing and shall be kept there for public inspection while the ordinance is in force. After the adoption of the code by reference, one of the copies of the primary code and of each secondary code may be kept in the office of the chief enforcement officer instead of in the office of the county clerk. Following the adoption of any code, the county clerk shall at all times maintain a reasonable supply of copies of the primary code and of any secondary codes incorporated in it by reference, available for purchase by the public at a moderate price.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1474, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-407. Amendments.

If at any time any code which any home rule county has previously adopted by reference is amended by the agency or municipality or county which originally promulgated, adopted, or enacted it, then the governing body may adopt such amendment by reference through the same procedure as required for the adoption of the original code; or an ordinance may be enacted in the regular manner, setting forth the entire text of such amendment.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1475, § 1, effective June 8.

30-35-408. Use as evidence.

Copies of such codes in published form, duly certified by the county clerk and executive officer of the home rule county, shall be received without further proof as prima facie evidence of the provisions of such codes or public records in all courts and administrative tribunals of this state.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1475, § 1, effective June 8.